Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0726.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 12m. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 285 to 289 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 285.83(4) Pub trst H Fraudulent warehouse receipt violations under the grain dealers act 5 285.279(2)(c) Property E False pretenses under Michigan family farm development act involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 285.279(2)(d) Property D False pretenses under Michigan family farm development act involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 286.228(6) Pub ord E Insect pest and plant disease act â intentional violation with intent to damage natural resources 5 286.260(4) Pub ord E Intentional violation of quarantine rule or order with intent to damage natural resources 5 286.929(4) Pub trst G Organic products act violations 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 287.323(1) Person C Dangerous animal causing death 15 287.323(2) Person G Dangerous animal causing serious injury 4 287.679(2) Pub ord H Dead animal violation â third or subsequent offense 1 287.744(10) Pub ord G Animal industry act violations 5 287.855 Pub saf G Violations involving contamination of livestock or diseased or quarantined livestock 5 287.967(5) Pub ord G Cervidae producer violations 4 289.853(2)(b) Pub saf E Providing adulterated human milk for human consumption causing physical injury 5 289.853(2)(c) Pub saf C Providing adulterated human milk for human consumption causing death 15 289.855(1)(b) Pub saf E Providing raw human milk for human consumption causing physical injury 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 289.855(1)(c) Pub saf C Providing raw human milk for human consumption causing death 15 289.5107(2) Pub saf F Adulterated, misbranded, or falsely identified food 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 724 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.